Texas, session 892, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 421, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter G to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER G.  DNA TESTING OF CERTAIN INDIVIDUALS CROSSING TEXAS-MEXICO BORDER Sec. 421.121.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "CODIS" has the meaning assigned by Section 411.141. (2)  "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid. (3)  "DNA database" has the meaning assigned by Section 411.141. (4)  "Rapid DNA test" means a process for developing a DNA profile of an individual: (A)  based on a biological sample consisting of a buccal swab of the individual; and (B)  without the need for human intervention in the process or the use of facilities dedicated to performing DNA analyses and testing. Sec. 421.122.  DNA TESTING PROGRAM; AGREEMENT. The Department of Public Safety shall enter into an agreement with the United States Department of Homeland Security on request to establish a program for: (1)  performing DNA tests, including rapid DNA tests, of individuals who: (A)  enter into this state by crossing between ports of entry along the Texas-Mexico border; (B)  are detained or arrested by the Department of Homeland Security; and (C)  the Department of Homeland Security has probable cause to believe engaged in conduct constituting an offense under Chapter 20A, Penal Code, evidence of which may include the coercion, confinement, or transportation of persons for labor or sexual exploitation; and (2)  promptly providing the results of the DNA tests described by Subdivision (1) to the Department of Homeland Security for use in the enforcement of federal immigration laws. Sec. 421.123.  BIOLOGICAL SAMPLES TO BE DESTROYED. The Department of Public Safety shall destroy the biological sample used to perform a DNA test, including a rapid DNA test, under the agreement described by Section 421.122 after performing the test and providing the results. Sec. 421.124.  DNA DATABASE AND USE OF CODIS PROHIBITED. The Department of Public Safety, using the results of DNA tests, including rapid DNA tests, performed under the agreement described by Section 421.122, may not: (1)  maintain a DNA database; (2)  enter the results of the DNA tests into CODIS; or (3)  search CODIS. Sec. 421.125.  REQUIRED PROVISIONS. The agreement described by Section 421.122 must contain provisions that are substantially similar to the duty under Section 421.123 and the prohibitions under Section 421.124. Sec. 421.126.  FUNDING.  Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the Department of Public Safety may not establish or operate the program under Section 421.122, unless the department receives funding from the United States Department of Homeland Security sufficient to cover the costs of establishing and operating the program, as determined by the Department of Public Safety. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.